Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF69.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1111YH (5) 91 ll/ns H.F. 69 Section 1. Section 123.46, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. A person shall not use or consume alcoholic liquor, 3 wine, or beer upon the public streets or highways. 4 b. A person shall not use or consume alcoholic liquor in 5 any public place except premises covered by a retail alcohol 6 license. 7 c. A person shall not possess or consume alcoholic 8 liquors liquor , wine, or beer on public school property or 9 while attending a public or private school-related function. 10 However, a school board may authorize the sale, possession, 11 and consumption of alcoholic liquor, wine, or beer on public 12 school property in conjunction with a social event or other 13 nonschool-related function deemed appropriate by the school 14 board. The authorization must require that the sale, 15 possession, and consumption of alcoholic liquor, wine, or 16 beer only occur on public school property that is a licensed 17 premises under a five-day retail alcohol license issued 18 pursuant to section 123.34. 19 d. A person shall not be intoxicated in a public place. 20 e. A person violating this subsection is guilty of a simple 21 misdemeanor. 22 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 23 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 24